Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PREVENTIVE MEDICINE

§321-31 Functions of the department.
The powers, duties, and functions of the department of health relating to
preventive medicine shall be as follows:

(1) To supervise and coordinate activities in the
fields of preventive medicine, including cancer control, crippled children,
epidemiology, geriatrics, laboratories, maternal and child health, mental
hygiene, nutrition, and communicable diseases;

(2) To formulate and put into effect throughout the
State educational programs for the purposes of preventing and reducing disease
and disability;

(3) To engage in the collection and analysis of
statistical information pertinent to any of its activities;

(4) To cooperate with and propose methods and
programs to other governmental agencies relating to the fields of preventive
medicine;

(5) To serve as the coordinating agency for programs
which provide for a range of child abuse and neglect prevention services in
relation to assessed needs, regardless of whether the programs are conducted by
the department, other government agencies, or private organizations and to
coordinate the prevention programs with child abuse and neglect treatment
services; provided that this paragraph shall not be interpreted to compel a
specified level of services; and

(6) To perform such other appropriate functions as
may be required. [L 1951, c 42, pt of §1; RL 1955, §46-29; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §19; HRS §321-31; am L 1984, c 212, §3; am L 1990, c 143, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next